Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska84-928
Negotiated rulemaking committee; membership; procedure.

(1) A negotiated rulemaking committee may by consensus expand its membership, either by contacting and recruiting persons whose participation the committee believes is essential to the success of the negotiated rulemaking process or upon reviewing a petition submitted pursuant to subsection (2) of this section.

(2) Persons who will be significantly affected by a proposed rule and who believe that their interests will not be adequately represented by any person on a negotiated rulemaking committee may petition for or nominate another person for membership on the negotiated rulemaking committee. Each petition or nomination shall be submitted to the negotiated rulemaking committee and shall include:

(a) The name of the petitioner or nominee and a description of the interests the person represents;

(b) Evidence that the petitioner or nominee is authorized to represent parties related to the interests the person proposes to represent;

(c) A written commitment that the petitioner or nominee will actively participate in good faith in the development of the rule under consideration; and

(d) An explanation of reasons that the persons already on the negotiated rulemaking committee do not adequately represent the interests of the person submitting the petition or nomination.

(3) Upon receiving a petition, a negotiated rulemaking committee shall decide by consensus at its next meeting whether or not to expand its membership.

Laws 1994, LB 446, § 8.